Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 5. Generally
§ 1-26-514.
Interest taken; due compensation.

In the case of public entities the court may grant an easement or fee simple title to the public entity if necessary for the purpose for which the land was condemned. In cases not involving public entities, following determination of due compensation the court shall enter an order granting an easement to the condemnor which shall not include any claim, interest or property in or to the underlying minerals or mineral estate except for subsurface support.

The court in determining due compensation may authorize a lump-sum payment or an annual installment or amortization payment to continue throughout the term of the easement.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Running of interest on judgment where both parties appeal, 11 ALR4th 1099.

Eminent domain: compensability of loss of visibility of owner's property, 7 ALR5th 113.

§ 1-26-515.
Abandonment, nonuse or new use.

Upon abandonment, nonuse
for a period of ten (10) years, or transfer or attempted transfer
to a use where the transferee could not have condemned for the new
use, or where the new use is not identical to the original use and
new damages to the landowner whose property was condemned for the
original use will occur, any easement authorized under this act terminates.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “this act,” see § 1-26-502(a)(vi).

Compensation for reclamation of pipeline easement

District court was not required to consider, as an element of just
compensation for a pipeline developer's taking of easements for a
pipeline, the developer's reclamation responsibility under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-26-714

at the time the easement terminated. Compensation for
reclamation was separate from, and in addition to, the compensation
for the taking.
Barlow Ranch, L.P. v. Greencore Pipeline Co. LLC, 2013 WY 34,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. R-13).

Cited

in

Bridle Bit Ranch Co. v. Basin Elec. Power Coop., 2005 WY 108, 118 P.3d 996,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(2005).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of provision of Cable Communications Policy Act (47 USC § 541(a)(2)) allowing cable companies access to utility easements on private property, 113 ALR Fed 523.

§ 1-26-516.
Action for inverse condemnation.

When a person possessing
the power of condemnation takes possession of or damages land in which
he has no interest, or substantially diminishes the use or value of
land, due to activities on adjoining land without the authorization
of the owner of the land or before filing an action of condemnation,
the owner of the land may file an action in district court seeking
damages for the taking or damage and shall be granted litigation expenses
if damages are awarded to the owner.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Action one for inverse condemnation.—

Trial court properly emphasized that in the absence of eminent domain proceedings the action was an inverse condemnation case because eminent domain proceedings were not used by a county for the expansion of a road; according to the county, it did not need to use eminent domain proceedings because it already had an easement for the project. Byrnes v. Johnson Cty. Comm'rs, 2020 WY 6, 455 P.3d 693,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2020).

Substantial diminishment of property's value.—

Trial court properly entered a judgment as a matter of law that a property owner failed to establish a taking and failed to provide proof of damages because the evidence presented did not prove a “substantial diminishment” of the property’s value; a witness’s testimony did not establish a value of the owner’s property as a whole, and the value of the property needed to be established in order to determine whether the impairment of the driveways substantially diminished that value. Byrnes v. Johnson Cty. Comm'rs, 2020 WY 6, 455 P.3d 693,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2020).

Value of property.—

Trial court properly entered a judgment as a matter of law on the ground that no jury would be able to determine the before and after value of property based on the evidence presented because the estimated costs for changes to the property did not equate to “fair market value"; the estimated costs did not reflect the value of an arms-length transaction for the sale of the property, did not establish the lack of a market for the property, and did not establish comparable sales. Byrnes v. Johnson Cty. Comm'rs, 2020 WY 6, 455 P.3d 693,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2020).

Trial court properly entered a judgment as a matter of law because the value of the property taken was not established; the only values presented were the value of the property after the road expansion, estimated costs of amending the driveway approaches, and an overall estimate of all costs, and under either of the two measures of damages in a partial takings case, the jury would not have been able to reach a conclusion based on the limited evidence presented. Byrnes v. Johnson Cty. Comm'rs, 2020 WY 6, 455 P.3d 693,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2020).

Permanent taking is not required

in order to maintain an action for inverse condemnation under this section. The plain language of the section evinces a legislative intent to allow recompense to an owner of property not only for permanent takings, but also for damage or diminution in value, although it is applicable only to conduct on adjoining land. Waid v. State, 996 P.2d 18,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2000).

Emotional distress is not a proper element of damages in an inverse condemnation action.

See Miller v. Campbell County, 854 P.2d 71,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1993).

Exclusive remedy in inverse condemnation. —

Owners'
exclusive remedy for a city's installation of a storm drain on their property in the mistaken belief that it owned an easement was in inverse condemnation. Because this remedy was available, the owners'
assertion that they were being deprived of access to the courts by not being allowed to pursue a Wyoming Governmental Claims Act claim lacked merit.
Sinclair v. City of Gillette, 2012 WY 19, 270 P.3d 644,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2012).

Facts not applied to statute. —

Plaintiff failed to accurately apply the statute to the facts of the case to establish how the prescribed activities set out in the statute relate to his situation, although he attempted to do so by resorting to arguments already disposed of by the district court. Doenz v. Sheridan County Bd. of County Comm'rs, 949 P.2d 464,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1997).

Plaintiffs' claim for inverse condemnation were untimely. —

Where the plaintiffs discovered the “act, error or omission” which provided the basis of the claim of inverse condemnation no later than the date of the 1987 flood, the two year time for filing claims under the statute began to run in July 1987, and it had expired by the time plaintiffs filed their claims with the department of transportation in 1995. Waid v. State, 996 P.2d 18,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2000).

Failure to exhaust administrative remedies. —

District court properly dismissed a property owner's claim for inverse condemnation against a county Weed and Pest Control District, its board of directors, and four of its employees because there was no indication in the record that the owner specifically pursued the statutory remedy, nothing in the record suggested that following the available procedure would have been futile, that the District adopted a policy or pursued a practice of general applicability which was contrary to the law, or that it was improbable that the owner could obtain appropriate relief through the administrative process.
Bush Land Dev. Co. v. Crook Cnty. Weed & Pest Control Dist., 2017 WY 12, 388 P.3d 536,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2017).

Condemnees' counterclaim properly dismissed. —

Order granting condemnor's motion to dismiss condemnees' counterclaim for inverse condemnation was properly granted where the condemnees presented no evidence as to any damages they incurred due to the condemnor's alleged inverse condemnation of their property in maintaining a water system for a reservoir's recreational facilities outside the boundaries of an easement granted the condemnor by the condemnees' predecessor in interest. Conner v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2002 WY 148, 54 P.3d 1274,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2002).

Constitutional signature and certification requirements were not met. —

District court should not have acquired jurisdiction over property owners'
inverse condemnation claim against a city under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-26-516

, because owners'
complaint failed to include an allegation that the constitutional signature and certification requirements were met as required by
Wyo. Const. art. 16, § 7.
Gose v. City of Douglas, 2008 WY 126, 193 P.3d 1159,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2008), overruled in part, Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

Cited

in

Miller v. Campbell County, 722 F. Supp. 687, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11685 (D. Wyo. 1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Zoning regulations limiting use of property near airport as taking of property, 18 ALR4th 542.

Local use zoning of wetlands or flood plain as taking without compensation, 19 ALR4th 756.

State statute of limitations applicable to inverse condemnation or similar proceedings by landowner to obtain compensation for direct appropriation of land without the institution or conclusion of formal proceeding against specific owner, 26 ALR4th 68.

Inverse condemnation state court class actions, 49 ALR4th 618.